Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-534
Certain cities of the first class; officers; wards; terms; qualifications.

(1) In a city of the first class except a city having adopted the commissioner or city manager plan of government, a mayor shall be elected at large and council members shall be elected by ward or at large and by ward as provided in section 32-554. If members are elected by ward, one or two council members shall be elected from each ward, except that there shall be at least four council members, and two council members shall be required for each ward in any city having fewer than four wards. The council may provide for the election of the treasurer and clerk as provided in section 16-302.01.

(2) All elected officers in a city of the first class shall serve for terms of four years or until their successors are elected and qualified. The council members shall be nominated at the statewide primary election and elected at the statewide general election. The council members shall meet the qualifications found in section 16-302.01.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 130;

Laws 2001, LB 730, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 970, § 2.